Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) (1) A person shall not knowingly leave a handgun
in an unattended vehicle unless the handgun is in a locked, hard-sided
container that is placed out of plain view, including a locked container that
is permanently affixed to the vehicle's interior, and the container is in any
of the following:
(A) A locked vehicle;
(B) the locked trunk of a locked vehicle;
(C) a locked truck-camper; or
(D) a locked recreational vehicle.
(2) A person shall not knowingly leave a firearm that is not a handgun
in an unattended vehicle unless the firearm is in a locked hard-sided or
locked soft-sided container, including a locked container that is
permanently affixed to the vehicle's interior, and the container is in any of
the following:
(A) A locked vehicle;
(B) the locked trunk of a locked vehicle;
(C) a locked truck-camper; or
(D) a locked recreational vehicle.
(3) A firearm that is not a handgun that is stored in a soft-sided
container shall have a tamper-resistant mechanical lock or other safety
device properly engaged so as to render the weapon inoperable while
stored in such soft-sided container.
(4) For purposes of this subsection, a locked glove compartment or
the locked center console of a vehicle is considered a locked hard-sided
container.
(b) Subsection (a)(1) and (a)(2) shall apply to any unattended vehicle
located on:

HB 2200 2
(1) A highway;
(2) public property;
(3) private property open to the public; or
(4) a parking lot or parking facility.
(c) Subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) shall not apply to:
(1) The storage or keeping of any firearm with a matchlock,
flintlock, percussion cap or similar type of ignition system
manufactured in or before the year 1898 or to any replica of any such
firearm, rifle or shotgun if such replica is not designed or redesigned for
using rimfire or conventional centerfire fixed ammunition;
(2) the storage of a firearm that is not a handgun in a vehicle that is
being used by a person for agricultural purposes, and such vehicle is being
operated on the person's private farm or ranch;
(3) a law enforcement officer;
(4) a person who holds a valid Kansas or nonresident hunting license
who is engaged in lawful hunting activities;
(5) a person engaged in the instruction of a hunter education course
pursuant to K.S.A. 32-920 through 32-924, and amendments thereto; and
(6) an active member of the United States armed forces while on
duty.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), a person who is
considered to have a disability and stores a firearm in a locked soft-sided
container does not violate subsection (a) with respect to the secure storage
of the firearm that is in the locked soft-sided container.
(e) A person who reports a lost or stolen firearm that was lost or
stolen as a result of a violation of subsection (a) shall be immune from any
fines or penalties for violating subsection (a) if such person reports the lost
or stolen firearm within 48 hours of such firearm being lost or stolen.
(f) The office of the attorney general, in coordination with the Kansas
highway patrol, shall conduct a secure storage of firearms in vehicles
educational campaign. Such campaign shall require the creation of:
(1) A public page on the office of the attorney general's concealed
carry permit website that includes information about the unlawful storage
of a firearm in an unattended vehicle as described in subsection (a); and
(2) a notice to be displayed on the premises of a licensed firearms
dealer, designed to be printed with each letter on the notice being a
minimum of one inch in height with black letters on a white background
and containing the following text:
NOTICE: Unlawful storage of a firearm in an unattended vehicle may
result in a fine.
(g) Every licensed firearms dealer shall post, in a conspicuous
location on its premises and at any other location where the dealer sells a
firearm, the notice developed by the office of the attorney general pursuant

HB 2200 3
to subsection (f) or a substantially similar warning notice containing
information on the unlawful storage of a firearm in an unattended vehicle.
(h) As used in this section:
(1) "Agricultural purposes" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 50-
624, and amendments thereto;
(2) "disability" means, with respect to a person:
(A) A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or
more of such person's major life activities;
(B) a record of having such an impairment; or
(C) being regarded as having such an impairment;
(3) "firearm" means any weapon designed or having the capacity to
propel a projectile by force of an explosion or combustion;
(4) "handgun" means:
(A) A pistol or revolver that is designed to be fired by the use of a
single hand and that is designed to fire or capable of firing a fixed
cartridge ammunition; or
(B) any other weapon that is designed to or will expel a projectile by
the action of an explosive and fired by the use of a single hand;
(5) "recreational vehicle" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 75-
1212, and amendments thereto.
(i) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the uniform act
regulating traffic on highways.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 8-2118 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-2118.
(a) A person charged with a traffic infraction shall, except as provided in
subsection (b), appear at the place and time specified in the notice to
appear. If the person enters an appearance, waives right to trial, pleads
guilty or no contest, the fine shall be no greater than that specified in the
uniform fine schedule in subsection (c) and court costs shall be taxed as
provided by law.
(b) Prior to the time specified in the notice to appear, a person
charged with a traffic infraction may enter a written appearance, waive
right to trial, plead guilty or no contest and pay the fine for the violation as
specified in the uniform fine schedule in subsection (c) and court costs
provided by law. Payment may be made in any manner accepted by the
court. The traffic citation shall not have been complied with if the payment
is not honored for any reason, or if the fine and court costs are not paid in
full. When a person charged with a traffic infraction makes payment
without executing a written waiver of right to trial and plea of guilty or no
contest, the payment shall be deemed such an appearance, waiver of right
to trial and plea of no contest.
(c) The following uniform fine schedule shall apply uniformly
throughout the state but shall not limit the fine that may be imposed
following a court appearance, except an appearance made for the purpose

HB 2200 4
of pleading and payment as permitted by subsection (a). The description of
offense contained in the following uniform fine schedule is for reference
only and is not a legal definition.
Description of Offense Statute Fine
Unsafe speed for prevailing 8-1557 $75
conditions
Exceeding maximum speed 8-1558 1-10 mph over the
limit; or speeding in zone to limit, $45
posted by the state depart- 8-1560
ment of transportation; or 8-1560a 11-20 mph over the
speeding in locally posted or limit, $45 plus $6
zone 8-1560b per mph over 10
mph over the limit;
21-30 mph over the
limit, $105 plus $9
per mph over 20
mph over the limit;
31 and more mph
over the limit, $195
plus $15 per mph
over 30 mph over
the limit;
Disobeying traffic control de- 8-1507 $75
vice
Violating traffic control signal 8-1508 $75
Violating pedestrian control 8-1509 $45
signal
Violating flashing traffic signals 8-1510 $75
Violating lane-control signal 8-1511 $75
Unauthorized sign, signal, 8-1512 $45
marking or device
Driving on left side of roadway 8-1514 $75
Failure to keep right to pass 8-1515 $75
oncoming vehicle
Improper passing; increasing 8-1516 $75
speed when passed
Improper passing on right 8-1517 $75
Passing on left with insuffi- 8-1518 $75
cient clearance
Driving on left side where 8-1519 $75
curve, grade, intersec-
tion railroad crossing, or
obstructed view

HB 2200 5
Driving on left in no-passing 8-1520 $75
zone
Unlawful passing of stopped 8-1520a $75
emergency vehicle
Driving wrong direction on 8-1521 $75
one-way road
Improper driving on laned 8-1522 $75
roadway
Following too close 8-1523 $75
Improper crossover on di- 8-1524 $45
vided highway
Failure to yield right-of-way 8-1526 $75
at uncontrolled intersection
Failure to yield to approach- 8-1527 $75
ing vehicle when turning
left
Failure to yield at stop or 8-1528 $75
yield sign
Failure to yield from private 8-1529 $75
road or driveway
Failure to yield to emergency 8-1530 $195
vehicle
Failure to yield to pedestrian 8-1531 $105
or vehicle working on
roadway
Failure to comply with re- 8-1531a $45
strictions in road con-
struction zone
Disobeying pedestrian traffic 8-1532 $45
control device
Failure to yield to pedestrian 8-1533 $75
in crosswalk; pedestrian
suddenly entering road-
way; passing vehicle
stopped for pedestrian at
crosswalk
Improper pedestrian crossing 8-1534 $45
Failure to exercise due care in 8-1535 $45
regard to pedestrian
Improper pedestrian move- 8-1536 $45
ment in crosswalk
Improper use of roadway by 8-1537 $45
pedestrian

HB 2200 6
Soliciting ride or business 8-1538 $45
on roadway
Driving through safety zone 8-1539 $45
Failure to yield to pedestrian 8-1540 $45
on sidewalk
Failure of pedestrian to yield 8-1541 $45
to emergency vehicle
Failure to yield to blind pe- 8-1542 $45
destrian
Pedestrian disobeying bridge 8-1544 $45
or railroad signal
Improper turn or approach 8-1545 $75
Improper "U" turn 8-1546 $75
Unsafe starting of stopped 8-1547 $45
vehicle
Unsafe turning or stopping, 8-1548 $75
failure to give proper sig-
nal; using turn signal un-
lawfully
Improper method of giving 8-1549 $45
notice of intention to turn
Improper hand signal 8-1550 $45
Failure to stop or obey 8-1551 $195
road crossing signal
Failure to stop at railroad 8-1552 $135
crossing stop sign
Certain hazardous vehicles 8-1553 $195
failure to stop at railroad
crossing
Improper moving of heavy 8-1554 $75
equipment at railroad
crossing
Vehicle emerging from alley, 8-1555 $75
private roadway, building
or driveway
Improper passing of school 8-1556 $315
bus; improper use of
school bus signals
Improper passing of church 8-1556a $195
or day-care bus; improper
use of signals
Impeding normal traffic 8-1561 $45
by slow speed

HB 2200 7
Speeding on motor-driven 8-1562 $75
cycle
Speeding in certain vehicles 8-1563 $45
or on posted bridge
Improper stopping, standing 8-1569 $45
or parking on roadway
Parking, standing or stopping 8-1571 $45
in prohibited area
Improper parking 8-1572 $45
Unattended vehicle 8-1573 $45
Improper backing 8-1574 $45
Driving on sidewalk 8-1575 $45
Driving with view or driving 8-1576 $45
mechanism obstructed
Unsafe opening of vehicle 8-1577 $45
door
Riding in house trailer 8-1578 $45
Unlawful riding on vehicle 8-1578a $75
Improper driving in defiles, 8-1579 $45
canyons, or on grades
Coasting 8-1580 $45
Following fire apparatus too 8-1581 $75
closely
Driving over fire hose 8-1582 $45
Putting glass, etc., on high- 8-1583 $105
way
Driving into intersection, 8-1584 $45
crosswalk, or crossing
without sufficient space
on other side
Improper operation of snow- 8-1585 $45
mobile on highway
Parental responsibility of 8-1586 $45
child riding bicycle
Not riding on bicycle seat; 8-1588 $45
too many persons on
bicycle
Clinging to other vehicle 8-1589 $45
Improper riding of bicycle on 8-1590 $45
roadway
Carrying articles on bicycle; 8-1591 $45
one hand on handlebars
Improper bicycle lamps, 8-1592 $45

HB 2200 8
brakes or reflectors
Improper operation of mo- 8-1594 $45
torcycle; seats; passen-
gers, bundles
Improper operation of motor 8-1595 $75
cycle on laned roadway
Motorcycle clinging to other 8-1596 $45
vehicle
Improper motorcycle handle- 8-1597 $75
bars or passenger
equipment
Motorcycle helmet and eye- 8-1598 $45
protection requirements
Unlawful operation of all-ter- 8-15,100 $75
rain vehicle
Unlawful operation of 8-15,101 $75
low-speed vehicle
Littering 8-15,102 $115
Disobeying school crossing 8-15,103 $75
guard
Unlawful operation of micro 8-15,106 $75
utility truck
Failure to remove vehicles in 8-15,107 $75
accidents
Unlawful operation of golf 8-15,108 $75
cart
Unlawful operation of work- 8-15,109 $75
site utility vehicle
Unlawful display of license 8-15,110 $60
plate
Unlawful text messaging 8-15,111 $60
Unlawful passing of a waste 8-15,112 $45
collection vehicle
Unlawful operation of 8-15,113 $45
electric-assisted scooter
Unlawful passing of a utility or 8-15,114 $105
telecommunications vehicle
Unlawful storage of firearm section 1 $100
in unattended vehicle
Equipment offenses that are 8-1701 $75
not misdemeanors
Driving without lights when 8-1703 $45
needed

HB 2200 9
Defective headlamps 8-1705 $45
Defective tail lamps 8-1706 $45
Defective reflector 8-1707 $45
Improper stop lamp or turn 8-1708 $45
signal
Improper lighting equipment 8-1710 $45
on certain vehicles
Improper lamp color on cer- 8-1711 $45
tain vehicles
Improper mounting of re- 8-1712 $45
flectors and lamps on cer-
tain vehicles
Improper visibility of reflec- 8-1713 $45
tors and lamps on certain
vehicles
No lamp or flag on projecting 8-1715 $75
load
Improper lamps on parked 8-1716 $45
vehicle
Improper lights, lamps, re- 8-1717 $45
flectors and emblems on
farm tractors or slow-
moving vehicles
Improper lamps and equip- 8-1718 $45
ment on implements of
husbandry, road machin-
ery or animal-drawn ve-
hicles
Unlawful use of spot, fog, or 8-1719 $45
auxiliary lamp
Improper lamps or lights on 8-1720 $45
emergency vehicle
Improper stop or turn signal 8-1721 $45
Improper vehicular hazard 8-1722 $45
warning lamp
Unauthorized additional 8-1723 $45
lighting equipment
Improper multiple-beam lights 8-1724 $45
Failure to dim headlights 8-1725 $75
Improper single-beam head- 8-1726 $45
lights
Improper speed with alter- 8-1727 $45
nate lighting

HB 2200 10
Improper number of driving 8-1728 $45
lamps
Unauthorized lights and sig- 8-1729 $45
nals
Improper school bus lighting 8-1730 $45
equipment and warning
devices
Unauthorized lights and de- 8-1730a $45
vices on church or day-
care bus
Improper lights on highway 8-1731 $45
construction or maintenance
vehicles
Defective brakes 8-1734 $45
Defective or improper use of 8-1738 $45
horn or warning device
Defective muffler 8-1739 $45
Defective mirror 8-1740 $45
Defective wipers; obstructed 8-1741 $45
windshield or windows
Improper tires 8-1742 $45
Improper flares or warning 8-1744 $45
devices
Improper use of vehicular 8-1745 $45
hazard warning lamps
and devices
Improper air-conditioning 8-1747 $45
equipment
Improper safety belt or 8-1749 $45
shoulder harness
Improper wide-based single 8-1742b $75
tires
Improper compression re- 8-1761 $75
lease engine braking sys-
tem
Defective motorcycle head- 8-1801 $45
lamp
Defective motorcycle tail 8-1802 $45
lamp
Defective motorcycle reflec- 8-1803 $45
tor
Defective motorcycle stop 8-1804 $45
lamps and turn signals

HB 2200 11
Defective multiple-beam 8-1805 $45
lighting
Improper road-lighting equip- 8-1806 $45
ment on motor-driven cy-
cles
Defective motorcycle or mo- 8-1807 $45
tor-driven cycle brakes
Improper performance abil- 8-1808 $45
ity of brakes
Operating motorcycle with 8-1809 $45
disapproved braking sys-
tem
Defective horn, muffler, mir- 8-1810 $45
rors or tires
Unlawful statehouse parking 75-4510a $30
Exceeding gross weight of 8-1909 Pounds Overweight
vehicle or combination up to 1000...........$40
1001 to 2000.........3¢
per pound
2001 to 5000.........5¢
per pound
5001 to 7500.........7¢
per pound
7501 and over.....10¢
per pound
Exceeding gross weight on 8-1908 Pounds Overweight
any axle or tandem, up to 1000...........$40
triple or quad axles 1001 to 2000.........3¢
per pound
2001 to 5000.........5¢
per pound
5001 to 7500.........7¢
per pound
7501 and over.....10¢
per pound
Failure to obtain proper re- 66-1324 $287
gistration, clearance or
to have current cer-
tification
Insufficient liability insur- 66-1,128 $137
ance for motor carriers or 66-1314
Failure to obtain interstate 79-34,122 $137
motor fuel tax author-

HB 2200 12
ization
No authority as private or 66-1,111 $137
common carrier
Violation of motor carrier 66-1,129 $115
safety rules and regula-
tions, except for viola-
tions specified in K.S.A.
66-1,130(b)(2), and
amendments thereto

(d) Traffic offenses classified as traffic infractions by this section
shall be classified as ordinance traffic infractions by those cities adopting
ordinances prohibiting the same offenses. A schedule of fines for all
ordinance traffic infractions shall be established by the municipal judge in
the manner prescribed by K.S.A. 12-4305, and amendments thereto. Such
fines may vary from those contained in the uniform fine schedule
contained in subsection (c).
(e) Fines listed in the uniform fine schedule contained in subsection
(c) shall be doubled if a person is convicted of a traffic infraction, which is
defined as a moving violation in accordance with rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to K.S.A. 8-249, and amendments thereto, committed
within any road construction zone as defined in K.S.A. 8-1458a, and
amendments thereto.
(f) For a second violation of K.S.A. 8-1908 or 8-1909, and
amendments thereto, within two years after a prior conviction of K.S.A. 8-
1908 or 8-1909, and amendments thereto, such person, upon conviction
shall be fined 11/ times the applicable amount from one, but not both, of

the schedules listed in the uniform fine schedule contained in subsection
(c). For a third violation of K.S.A. 8-1908 or 8-1909, and amendments
thereto, within two years, after two prior convictions of K.S.A. 8-1908 or
8-1909, and amendments thereto, such person, upon conviction shall be
fined two times the applicable amount from one, but not both, of the
schedules listed in the uniform fine schedule contained in subsection (c).
For a fourth and each succeeding violation of K.S.A. 8-1908 or 8-1909,
and amendments thereto, within two years after three prior convictions of
K.S.A. 8-1908 or 8-1909, and amendments thereto, such person, upon
conviction shall be fined 21/ times the applicable amount from one, but

not both, of the schedules listed in the uniform fine schedule contained in
subsection (c).
(g) Fines listed in the uniform fine schedule contained in subsection
(c) relating to exceeding the maximum speed limit, shall be doubled if a
person is convicted of exceeding the maximum speed limit in a school
zone authorized under K.S.A. 8-1560(a)(4), and amendments thereto.

HB 2200 13
(h) For a second violation of K.S.A. 8-1556, and amendments thereto,
within five years after a prior conviction of K.S.A. 8-1556, and
amendments thereto, such person, upon conviction, shall be fined $750 for
the second violation. For a third and each succeeding violation of K.S.A.
8-1556, and amendments thereto, within five years after two prior
convictions of K.S.A. 8-1556, and amendments thereto, such person, upon
conviction, shall be fined $1,000 for the third and each succeeding
violation.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 8-2118 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.